Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,245
Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Advisory Committee; created; members; expenses; termination.

The Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Advisory Committee is created. The advisory committee terminates on July 1, 2026. The advisory committee shall be composed of the following eleven members:

(1) Seven members appointed by the director as follows:

(a) Five private onsite wastewater treatment system professionals; and

(b) Two registered environmental health specialists or officials representing local public health departments which have established programs for regulating private onsite wastewater treatment systems;

(2) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or her designee;

(3) The Director of Environment and Energy or his or her designated representative; and

(4) One representative with experience in soils and geology and one representative with experience in biological engineering, both of whom shall be designated by the vice chancellor of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources.

Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The department shall provide administrative support for the advisory committee.

This section terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 761;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 153;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 125;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 58.